Utah statutes.
26-6b-8.   Transportation of individuals subject to temporary or court-ordered restriction.

Transportation of an individual subject to an order of restriction to court, or to a place for examination, quarantine, isolation, or treatment pursuant a temporary order issued by a department, or pursuant to a court order, shall be conducted by the county sheriff where the individual is located.



Amended by Chapter 185, 2006 General Session

